Arkansas, session 2025, HB1451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-85-402(4), concerning the definition of
"student" under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(4) “Student” means a person in grade nine (9), grade ten (10),
grade eleven (11), or grade twelve (12) who is enrolled at a:
(A) Public high school in Arkansas;
(B) Private high school in Arkansas; or
(C) Home school, as defined in § 6-15-501.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-85-405, concerning distribution and award
amounts under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) The division may distribute scholarships for students in grade
nine (9) up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in total
scholarship awards.
*CRH021*
02-25-2025 09:25:50 CRH021

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 HB1451

/s/Lundstrum


































02-25-2025 09:25:50 CRH021